California, session 20252026, AB2284.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 12525.6 is added to the Government Code, to read:12525.6. (a) On or before June 1, 2027, the Attorney General shall, in partnership with biking nonprofit groups, compile a list of electric two-wheeled devices that do not comply with the definition of any single class of electric bicycles, as defined in Section 312.5 of the Vehicle Code, and that are labeled, advertised, or commonly perceived by riders or peace officers as electric bicycles or electric bicycle products.(b) (1) The office of the Attorney General shall make the list publicly available on its internet website.(2) The Attorney General shall update the list and the internet website, when necessary.SECTION 1.Section 2425 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:2425.(a)On or before June 1, 2027, the Department of the California Highway Patrol shall, in partnership with biking nonprofit groups, compile a list of electric two-wheeled devices that do not comply with the definition of any single class of electric bicycles, as defined in Section 312.5 and that are labeled, advertised, or commonly perceived by riders or peace officers as electric bicycles or electric bicycle products.(b)(1)The department shall make the list publicly available on its internet website.(2)The department shall update the list and the internet website, when necessary.